Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5691.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-128 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Housing
Resources Act of 1998" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-128-18. Comprehensive assessments required.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Developer” means a person or entity that construct or builds a project.
(2) “Municipality” means any city or town where the project will be physically situated.
(3) "Project" means the building, erection, expansion or addition of any building, complex
or structure for intended residential use.
(b) A developer who proposes to develop a project to include, but not be limited to, a
qualified Rhode Island project, as part of any approval process which the developer is required to
follow at the municipal level in order to undertake and complete the project, shall submit a
comprehensive assessment of the project to each municipality where the proposed project shall be
physically located.
(c) The comprehensive assessment shall identify, as to the extent practical, a measure of
the impact of the project on municipal services and operations. The comprehensive assessment
shall include quantified, measured estimates of the fiscal impact of the project on a municipality’s
schools, transportation, public safety, water supply, wastewater systems, and environmental
resources. The developer shall collaborate with municipal and school officials to identify potential

challenges and mitigation measures to the municipality if the project is approved, developed, and
completed.
(d) The cost of conducting the comprehensive assessment shall be borne by developers to
alleviate financial burdens on municipalities.
(e) Municipalities shall establish clear guidelines for the review and public disclosure of
assessment findings to enhance community engagement and accountability and a comprehensive
assessment pursuant to this section shall be deemed a public record as defined in § 38-2-2.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC001306
========
LC001306 - Page 2 of 3